District of Columbia statutes.
31-5310

Reinsurance.

A domestic society may enter into reinsurance transactions only in accordance with Chapter 5 of this title. Notwithstanding that law, a society may reinsure the risks of another society in a consolidation or merger approved by the Commissioner under § 31-5311.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1211, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1240.